Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5410.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. As used in this act: (a) "Board" means the Michigan domestic and sexual violence prevention and treatment board created under Executive Order No. 2012-17. (b) "Common household pets" means domesticated animals, including, but not limited to, dogs or cats, that are commonly kept in a home for pleasure and that are not kept in the home for commercial purposes. (c) (b) "Dating relationship" means frequent, intimate associations primarily characterized by the expectation of affectional involvement. Dating relationship does not include a casual relationship or an ordinary fraternization between 2 individuals in a business or social context. (d) (c) "Department" means the department of health and human services. (e) (d) "Domestic violence" means the occurrence of any of the following acts by an individual that is not an act of self-defense: (i) Causing or attempting to cause physical or mental harm to a family or household member. (ii) Placing a family or household member in fear of physical or mental harm. (iii) Causing or attempting to cause a family or household member to engage in involuntary sexual activity by force, threat of force, or duress. (iv) Engaging in activity toward a family or household member that would cause a reasonable individual to feel terrorized, frightened, intimidated, threatened, harassed, or molested. (f) (e) "Family or household member" includes any of the following: (i) A spouse or former spouse. (ii) An individual with whom the person resides or has resided. (iii) An individual with whom the person has or has had a dating relationship. (iv) An individual with whom the person is or has engaged in a sexual relationship. (v) An individual to whom the person is related or was formerly related by marriage. (vi) An individual with whom the person has a child in common. (vii) The minor child of an individual described in subparagraphs (i) to (vi). (g) (f) "Fund" means the domestic violence prevention and treatment fund created in section 5. (h) (g) "Prime sponsor" means a county, city, village, or township of this state, or a combination thereof, a federally recognized Indian tribe that has trust land located within this state, or a private, nonprofit association or organization. Sec. 7. (1) A prime sponsor may receive funds under this act to establish or maintain a shelter program for victims of domestic violence and their dependent children. Emergency shelter may be provided directly at a facility operated by the prime sponsor or indirectly at transient or residential facilities available in the community. A shelter program shall either provide not less than 3 of the following services or assist the victim in obtaining information and referral services to not less than 3 of the following services: (a) Crisis and support counseling for victims of domestic violence and their dependent children. (b) Emergency health care services. (c) Legal assistance. (d) Financial assistance. (e) Housing assistance. (f) Transportation assistance. (g) Child care services. (h) Supportive services for common household pets, including shelter. (2) To the extent possible, a prime sponsor which that establishes a shelter program under this section shall utilize services provided by county community mental health programs established under chapter 2 of Act No. 258 of the Public Acts of 1974, as amended, being sections 330.1200 to 330.1246 of the Michigan Compiled Laws.sections 200a to 245 of the mental health code, 1974 PA 258, MCL 330.1200a to 330.1245.